Maryland, session 2026, HB0881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force on Not–for–Profit Funeral Establishments.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) one representative from the Funeral Consumers Alliance of Maryland
and Environs, designated by the president of the Alliance;
(4) one representative from the Maryland State Funeral Directors
Association, designated by the president of the Association; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Health:
(i) one representative of a funeral establishment that serves
customers who are primarily African American;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0881*

HOUSE BILL 881
(ii) one representative of a funeral establishment that serves
customers who are primarily Catholic;
(iii) one representative of a funeral establishment that serves
customers who are primarily Jewish;
(iv) one representative of a funeral establishment that serves
customers who are primarily Muslim; and
(v) one representative of a funeral establishment that serves
customers who are primarily Protestant.
(c) The chair of the Task Force shall be selected by a majority vote of the members
of the Task Force.
(d) The State Board of Morticians and Funeral Directors shall provide staff for
the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall analyze:
(1) the number of individuals licensed to practice funeral direction in the
State;
(2) the number of corporations that applied for a license to practice funeral
direction;
(3) the number of applications to practice funeral direction that were
denied because of the ineligibility of the applicant;
(4) the reason each application for a license to practice funeral direction
was denied;
(5) laws and regulations of other jurisdictions that authorize not–for–profit
entities to practice funeral direction;
(6) the potential impact of authorizing not–for–profit entities to practice
funeral direction in the State; and
(7) the feasibility and necessity of the establishment of not–for–profit
funeral establishments in the State.

HOUSE BILL 881 3
(g) On or before December 1, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of September
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.